Missouri, session 2026, SB1322.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.006 and 192.020, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 192.006 and 192.020, to read as follows:
192.006. The department of health and senior services
may adopt, appeal and amend rules necessary to carry out the
duties assigned to it. All rules shall be promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of this section and chapter 536.
No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority
of this chapter shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
No rule promulgated by the department shall delegate the
department's rulemaking authority to any official, agency,
or other department. No rule promulgated by the department
shall grant rulemaking authority to a state or local
administrative official.
192.020. 1. It shall be the general duty and
responsibility of the department of health and senior
services to safeguard the health of the people in the state
and all its subdivisions. It shall make a study of the
causes and prevention of diseases. It shall designate those

SB 1322 2
diseases which are infectious, contagious, communicable or
dangerous in their nature and shall make and enforce
adequate orders, findings, rules and regulations to prevent
the spread of such diseases and to determine the prevalence
of such diseases within the state. It shall have power and
authority, with approval of the director of the department,
to make such orders, findings, rules and regulations as will
prevent the entrance of infectious, contagious and
communicable diseases into the state. No order, rule, or
regulation made or promulgated by the department shall
delegate the department's authority to promulgate or make
orders, rules, or regulations to any official, agency, or
other department. No order, rule, or regulation promulgated
or made by the department shall grant authority to
promulgate or make orders, rules, or regulations to a state
or local administrative official. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prohibit a county health
officer or local health authority from enforcing the
department's rules and regulations and local ordinances
pursuant to sections 192.280 and 192.290.
2. The department of health and senior services shall
include in its list of communicable or infectious diseases
which must be reported to the department methicillin-
resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), carbapenem-resistant
enterobacteriaceae (CRE) as specified by the department, and
vancomycin-resistant enterococcus (VRE).
✓